District of Columbia statutes.
1-327.33

Transfers; abolishment.

All personnel, property, records, functions, and unexpended balances of funds from the following agencies, offices, or units are transferred to the Customer Service Operations Unit, established pursuant to § 1-327.32:

(1)

The Citywide Call Center established in § 1-327.01 [repealed];

(2)

The Mayor’s Correspondence Unit, established in Mayor’s Order 73-172, issued November 5, 1973; and

(3)

The Tester Program in the Executive Office of the Mayor.

History

Oct. 1, 2002, D.C. Law 14-190, § 1203(a), 49 DCR 6968

Prior Codifications

2001 Ed., § 1-328.03.